Maryland, session 2026, SB0824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
15–305.
(b) A license to deal in new vehicles may be issued only for a dealer in new vehicles
who holds a franchise from:
(1) The manufacturer of the vehicles; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0824*

SENATE BILL 824
(2) A distributor who is authorized by the manufacturer or the
manufacturer’s authorized importer of the vehicles.
(e) (2) (i) Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (f) of this section and
subject to [subparagraph (ii)] SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) of this paragraph, a
manufacturer or distributor may be licensed as a dealer if:
1. The manufacturer or distributor [deals] MANUFACTURES
OR DISTRIBUTES only [in electric] BATTERY–ELECTRIC or nonfossil–fuel burning
vehicles;
2. No dealer in the State holds a franchise from the
manufacturer or distributor;
3. The manufacturer or distributor[, or a subsidiary, an
affiliate, or a controlled entity of the manufacturer or distributor, does not hold a controlling
interest in another manufacturer or distributor, or a subsidiary, an affiliate, or a controlled
entity of the other manufacturer or distributor, that is licensed as a dealer under this
paragraph] IS NOT OWNED BY, CONTROLLED BY, UNDER COMMON CONTROL WITH, OR
AFFILIATED, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, WITH ANY OTHER MANUFACTURER OR
DISTRIBUTOR THAT HAS FRANCHISED DEALERS; and
4. [No other manufacturer or distributor, or subsidiary,
affiliate, or controlled entity of the other manufacturer or distributor, that is licensed as a
dealer under this paragraph, holds a controlling interest in the manufacturer or distributor,
or a subsidiary, an affiliate, or a controlled entity of the manufacturer or distributor] THE
MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR IS NOT A SUBSIDIARY, AN AFFILIATE, A DIVISION,
A BRAND, A JOINT VENTURE WITH, OR SUCCESSOR TO ANY OTHER MANUFACTURER
OR DISTRIBUTOR THAT HAS FRANCHISED DEALERS.
(ii) A MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR SEEKING A DEALER
LICENSE SHALL DEMONSTRATE TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE ADMINISTRATION
THAT IT COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(III) No more than four licenses may be issued under this paragraph.
[(iii)] (IV) The Administration shall adopt regulations to implement
this paragraph.
(f) A manufacturer or distributor, or a person who is acting for a partnership or
corporation that is owned or controlled by or under common control with a manufacturer
or distributor, may not sell a new vehicle to a retail buyer.

SENATE BILL 824 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.